Utah statutes.
61-2-4.   One act for compensation qualifies person as broker or sales
agent.
Except as provided in Section 61-2-3, one act, for valuable consideration, of
buying, selling, leasing, managing, or exchanging real estate for another, or
of offering for another to buy, sell, lease, manage, or exchange real estate,
requires the person performing, offering, or attempting to perform the act to
be licensed as a principal real estate broker, an associate real estate
broker, or a real estate sales agent as set forth in this chapter.
